Illinois, session 104th, HB1390.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Sections 1.2, 1.20, 3d, 5, 6, 7, 11.5, 12, 12a, 13, 14a, 15, 6and 16 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 505/1.2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 417.2)8    Sec. 1.2. Distributor. "Distributor" means a person who 9does any of the following: (1) either (i) produces motor fuel 10in this State; (2) , refines motor fuel in this State; (3) , 11blends motor fuel in this State; (4) , compounds motor fuel in 12this State; (5) or manufactures motor fuel in this State; (6) , 13or (ii) transports motor fuel into this State; (7) , or (iii) 14exports motor fuel out of this State; or (8) , or (iv) engages 15in the distribution of motor fuel primarily by tank car or tank 16truck, or both, and who operates an Illinois bulk plant where 17he or she has active bulk storage capacity of not less than 1830,000 gallons for gasoline as defined in item (A) of Section 5 19of this Law.20    "Distributor" does not, however, include a person who 21receives or transports into this State and sells or uses motor 22fuel under such circumstances as preclude the collection of 23the tax herein imposed, by reason of the provisions of the   HB1390- 2 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1constitution and statutes of the United States. However, a 2person operating a motor vehicle into the State, may transport 3motor fuel in the ordinary fuel tank attached to the motor 4vehicle for the operation of the motor vehicle, without being 5considered a distributor. Any railroad registered under 6Section 18c-7201 of the Illinois Vehicle Code may deliver 7special fuel directly into the fuel supply tank of a 8locomotive owned, operated, or controlled by any other 9railroad registered under Section 18c-7201 of the Illinois 10Vehicle Code without being considered a distributor or 11supplier.12(Source: P.A. 96-1384, eff. 7-29-10.) 13    (35 ILCS 505/1.20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 417.20)14    Sec. 1.20. "Receiver" means a person who either produces, 15refines, blends, compounds or manufactures fuel in this State, 16or transports fuel into this State or receives fuel 17transported to him from without the State or exports fuel out 18of this State, or who is engaged in distribution of fuel 19primarily by tank car or tank truck, or both, and who operates 20an Illinois bulk plant where he has active fuel bulk storage 21capacity of not less than 30,000 gallons. 22(Source: P.A. 86-125; 86-958.) 23    (35 ILCS 505/3d)24    Sec. 3d. Right to blend.  HB1390- 3 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    (a) A distributor who is properly licensed and permitted 2as a blender pursuant to this Act may blend petroleum-based 3diesel fuel with biodiesel and sell the blended or unblended 4product on any premises owned and operated by the distributor 5for the purpose of supporting or facilitating the retail sale 6of motor fuel. 7    (b) A refiner or distributor supplier of petroleum-based 8diesel fuel or biodiesel shall not refuse to sell or transport 9to a distributor who is properly licensed and permitted as a 10blender pursuant to this Act any petroleum-based diesel fuel 11or biodiesel based on the distributor's or dealer's intent to 12use that product for blending. 13(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22.) 14    (35 ILCS 505/5)  (from Ch. 120, par. 421)15    Sec. 5. Distributor's monthly return. Except as 16hereinafter provided, a person holding a valid unrevoked 17license to act as a distributor of motor fuel shall, between 18the 1st and 20th days of each calendar month, make return to 19the Department, showing an itemized statement of the number of 20invoiced gallons of motor fuel of the types specified in this 21Section which were purchased, acquired, received, or exported 22during the preceding calendar month; the amount of such motor 23fuel produced, refined, compounded, manufactured, blended, 24sold, distributed, exported, and used by the licensed 25distributor during the preceding calendar month; the amount of   HB1390- 4 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1such motor fuel lost or destroyed during the preceding 2calendar month; the amount of such motor fuel on hand at the 3close of business for such month; and such other reasonable 4information as the Department may require. If a distributor's 5only activities with respect to motor fuel are either: (1) 6production of alcohol in quantities of less than 10,000 proof 7gallons per year or (2) blending alcohol in quantities of less 8than 10,000 proof gallons per year which such distributor has 9produced, he shall file returns on an annual basis with the 10return for a given year being due by January 20 of the 11following year. Distributors whose total production of alcohol 12(whether blended or not) exceeds 10,000 proof gallons per 13year, based on production during the preceding (calendar) year 14or as reasonably projected by the Department if one calendar 15year's record of production cannot be established, shall file 16returns between the 1st and 20th days of each calendar month as 17hereinabove provided.18    The types of motor fuel referred to in the preceding 19paragraph are: (A) All products commonly or commercially known 20or sold as gasoline (including casing-head and absorption or 21natural gasoline), gasohol, motor benzol or motor benzene 22regardless of their classification or uses; and (B) all 23combustible gases, not including liquefied natural gas, which 24exist in a gaseous state at 60 degrees Fahrenheit and at 14.7 25pounds per square inch absolute including, but not limited to, 26liquefied petroleum gases used for highway purposes; and (C)   HB1390- 5 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1special fuel. Only those quantities of combustible gases 2(example (B) above) which are used or sold by the distributor 3to be used to propel motor vehicles on the public highways, or 4which are delivered into a storage tank that is located at a 5facility that has withdrawal facilities which are readily 6accessible to and are capable of dispensing combustible gases 7into the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles, shall be subject 8to return. Distributors of liquefied natural gas are not 9required to make returns under this Section with respect to 10that liquefied natural gas unless (i) the liquefied natural 11gas is dispensed into the fuel supply tank of any motor vehicle 12or (ii) the liquefied natural gas is delivered into a storage 13tank that is located at a facility that has withdrawal 14facilities which are readily accessible to and are capable of 15dispensing liquefied natural gas into the fuel supply tanks of 16motor vehicles. For purposes of this Section, a facility is 17considered to have withdrawal facilities that are not "readily 18accessible to and capable of dispensing combustible gases into 19the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles" only if the 20combustible gases or liquefied natural gas are delivered from: 21(i) a dispenser hose that is short enough so that it will not 22reach the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle or (ii) a 23dispenser that is enclosed by a fence or other physical 24barrier so that a vehicle cannot pull alongside the dispenser 25to permit fueling. For the purposes of this Act, liquefied 26petroleum gases shall mean and include any material having a   HB1390- 6 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1vapor pressure not exceeding that allowed for commercial 2propane composed predominantly of the following hydrocarbons, 3either by themselves or as mixtures: Propane, Propylene, 4Butane (normal butane or iso-butane) and Butylene (including 5isomers).6    In case of a sale of special fuel to someone other than a 7licensed distributor, or a licensed supplier, for a use other 8than in motor vehicles, the distributor shall show in his 9return the amount of invoiced gallons sold and the name and 10address of the purchaser in addition to any other information 11the Department may require.12    All special fuel sold or used for non-highway purposes 13must have a dye added in accordance with Section 4d of this 14Law.15    In case of a tax-free sale, as provided in Section 6, of 16motor fuel which the distributor is required by this Section 17to include in his return to the Department, the distributor in 18his return shall show: (1) If the sale is made to another 19licensed distributor the amount sold and the name, address and 20license number of the purchasing distributor; (2) if the sale 21is made to a person where delivery is made outside of this 22State the name and address of such purchaser and the point of 23delivery together with the date and amount delivered; (3) if 24the sale is made to the Federal Government or its 25instrumentalities the amount sold; (4) if the sale is made to a 26municipal corporation owning and operating a local   HB1390- 7 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1transportation system for public service in this State the 2name and address of such purchaser, and the amount sold, as 3evidenced by official forms of exemption certificates properly 4executed and furnished by such purchaser; (5) if the sale is 5made to a privately owned public utility owning and operating 62-axle vehicles designed and used for transporting more than 7 7passengers, which vehicles are used as common carriers in 8general transportation of passengers, are not devoted to any 9specialized purpose and are operated entirely within the 10territorial limits of a single municipality or of any group of 11contiguous municipalities or in a close radius thereof, and 12the operations of which are subject to the regulations of the 13Illinois Commerce Commission, then the name and address of 14such purchaser and the amount sold as evidenced by official 15forms of exemption certificates properly executed and 16furnished by the purchaser; (6) if the product sold is special 17fuel and if the sale is made to a licensed supplier under 18conditions which qualify the sale for tax exemption under 19Section 6 of this Act, the amount sold and the name, address 20and license number of the purchaser; and (6) (7) if a sale of 21special fuel is made to someone other than a licensed 22distributor, or a licensed supplier, for a use other than in 23motor vehicles, by making a specific notation thereof on the 24invoice or sales slip covering such sales and obtaining such 25supporting documentation as may be required by the Department.26    All special fuel sold or used for non-highway purposes   HB1390- 8 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1must have a dye added in accordance with Section 4d of this 2Law.3    A person whose license to act as a distributor of motor 4fuel has been revoked shall make a return to the Department 5covering the period from the date of the last return to the 6date of the revocation of the license, which return shall be 7delivered to the Department not later than 10 days from the 8date of the revocation or termination of the license of such 9distributor; the return shall in all other respects be subject 10to the same provisions and conditions as returns by 11distributors licensed under the provisions of this Act.12    The records, waybills and supporting documents kept by 13railroads and other common carriers in the regular course of 14business shall be prima facie evidence of the contents and 15receipt of cars or tanks covered by those records, waybills or 16supporting documents.17    If the Department has reason to believe and does believe 18that the amount shown on the return as purchased, acquired, 19received, exported, sold, used, lost or destroyed is 20incorrect, or that an amount of motor fuel of the types 21required by the second paragraph of this Section to be 22reported to the Department has not been correctly reported the 23Department shall fix an amount for such receipt, sales, 24export, use, loss or destruction according to its best 25judgment and information, which amount so fixed by the 26Department shall be prima facie correct. All returns shall be   HB1390- 9 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1made on forms prepared and furnished by the Department, and 2shall contain such other information as the Department may 3reasonably require. The return must be accompanied by 4appropriate computer-generated magnetic media supporting 5schedule data in the format required by the Department, 6unless, as provided by rule, the Department grants an 7exception upon petition of a taxpayer. All licensed 8distributors shall report all losses of motor fuel sustained 9on account of fire, theft, spillage, spoilage, leakage, or any 10other provable cause when filing the return for the period 11during which the loss occurred. If the distributor reports 12losses due to fire or theft, then the distributor must include 13fire department or police department reports and any other 14documentation that the Department may require. The mere making 15of the report does not assure the allowance of the loss as a 16reduction in tax liability. Losses of motor fuel as the result 17of evaporation or shrinkage due to temperature variations may 18not exceed 1% of the total gallons in storage at the beginning 19of the month, plus the receipts of gallonage during the month, 20minus the gallonage remaining in storage at the end of the 21month. Any loss reported that is in excess of 1% shall be 22subject to the tax imposed by Section 2 of this Law. On and 23after July 1, 2001, for each 6-month period January through 24June, net losses of motor fuel (for each category of motor fuel 25that is required to be reported on a return) as the result of 26evaporation or shrinkage due to temperature variations may not   HB1390- 10 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1exceed 1% of the total gallons in storage at the beginning of 2each January, plus the receipts of gallonage each January 3through June, minus the gallonage remaining in storage at the 4end of each June. On and after July 1, 2001, for each 6-month 5period July through December, net losses of motor fuel (for 6each category of motor fuel that is required to be reported on 7a return) as the result of evaporation or shrinkage due to 8temperature variations may not exceed 1% of the total gallons 9in storage at the beginning of each July, plus the receipts of 10gallonage each July through December, minus the gallonage 11remaining in storage at the end of each December. Any net loss 12reported that is in excess of this amount shall be subject to 13the tax imposed by Section 2 of this Law. For purposes of this 14Section, "net loss" means the number of gallons gained through 15temperature variations minus the number of gallons lost 16through temperature variations or evaporation for each of the 17respective 6-month periods.18    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 19distributor's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an 20original return, the Department may authorize the distributor 21to credit such excess payment against liability subsequently 22to be remitted to the Department under this Act, in accordance 23with reasonable rules adopted by the Department. If the 24Department subsequently determines that all or any part of the 25credit taken was not actually due to the distributor, the 26distributor's discount shall be reduced by an amount equal to   HB1390- 11 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1the difference between the discount as applied to the credit 2taken and that actually due, and that distributor shall be 3liable for penalties and interest on such difference. 4(Source: P.A. 100-9, eff. 7-1-17; 100-1171, eff. 1-4-19.) 5    (35 ILCS 505/6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 422)6    Sec. 6. Collection of tax; distributors. A distributor who 7sells or distributes any motor fuel, which he is required by 8Section 5 to report to the Department when filing a return, 9shall (except as hereinafter provided) collect at the time of 10such sale and distribution, the amount of tax imposed under 11this Act on all such motor fuel sold and distributed, and at 12the time of making a return, the distributor shall pay to the 13Department the amount so collected less a discount of 2% 14through June 30, 2003 and 1.75% thereafter which is allowed to 15reimburse the distributor for the expenses incurred in keeping 16records, preparing and filing returns, collecting and 17remitting the tax and supplying data to the Department on 18request, and shall also pay to the Department an amount equal 19to the amount that would be collectible as a tax in the event 20of a sale thereof on all such motor fuel used by said 21distributor during the period covered by the return. However, 22no payment shall be made based upon dyed diesel fuel used by 23the distributor for non-highway purposes. The discount shall 24only be applicable to the amount of tax payment which 25accompanies a return which is filed timely in accordance with   HB1390- 12 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1Section 5 of this Act. In each subsequent sale of motor fuel on 2which the amount of tax imposed under this Act has been 3collected as provided in this Section, the amount so collected 4shall be added to the selling price, so that the amount of tax 5is paid ultimately by the user of the motor fuel. However, no 6collection or payment shall be made in the case of the sale or 7use of any motor fuel to the extent to which such sale or use 8of motor fuel may not, under the constitution and statutes of 9the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this 10State. A person whose license to act as a distributor of fuel 11has been revoked shall, at the time of making a return, also 12pay to the Department an amount equal to the amount that would 13be collectible as a tax in the event of a sale thereof on all 14motor fuel, which he is required by the second paragraph of 15Section 5 to report to the Department in making a return, and 16which he had on hand on the date on which the license was 17revoked, and with respect to which no tax had been previously 18paid under this Act.19    A distributor may make tax free sales of motor fuel, with 20respect to which he is otherwise required to collect the tax, 21only as specified in the following items 1 through 7.22        1. When the sale is made to a person holding a valid 23    unrevoked license as a distributor, by making a specific 24    notation thereof on invoices or sales slip covering each 25    sale.26        2. When the sale is made with delivery to a purchaser   HB1390- 13 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    outside of this State.2        3. When the sale is made to the Federal Government or 3    its instrumentalities.4        4. When the sale is made to a municipal corporation 5    owning and operating a local transportation system for 6    public service in this State when an official certificate 7    of exemption is obtained in lieu of the tax.8        5. When the sale is made to a privately owned public 9    utility owning and operating 2 axle vehicles designed and 10    used for transporting more than 7 passengers, which 11    vehicles are used as common carriers in general 12    transportation of passengers, are not devoted to any 13    specialized purpose and are operated entirely within the 14    territorial limits of a single municipality or of any 15    group of contiguous municipalities, or in a close radius 16    thereof, and the operations of which are subject to the 17    regulations of the Illinois Commerce Commission, when an 18    official certificate of exemption is obtained in lieu of 19    the tax.20        6. (Blank). When a sale of special fuel is made to a 21    person holding a valid, unrevoked license as a supplier, 22    by making a specific notation thereof on the invoice or 23    sales slip covering each such sale.24        7. When a sale of dyed diesel fuel is made by the 25    licensed distributor to the end user of the fuel who is not 26    a licensed distributor or a licensed supplier for   HB1390- 14 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    non-highway purposes and the fuel is (i) delivered from a 2    vehicle designed for the specific purpose of such sales 3    and delivered directly into a stationary bulk storage tank 4    that displays the notice required by Section 4f of this 5    Act, (ii) delivered from a vehicle designed for the 6    specific purpose of such sales and delivered directly into 7    the fuel supply tanks of non-highway vehicles that are not 8    required to be registered for highway use, or (iii) 9    dispensed from a dyed diesel fuel dispensing facility that 10    has withdrawal facilities that are not readily accessible 11    to and are not capable of dispensing dyed diesel fuel into 12    the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle. 13        A specific notation is required on the invoice or 14    sales slip covering such sales, and any supporting 15    documentation that may be required by the Department must 16    be obtained by the distributor. The distributor shall 17    obtain and keep the supporting documentation in such form 18    as the Department may require by rule.19        For purposes of this item 7, a dyed diesel fuel 20    dispensing facility is considered to have withdrawal 21    facilities that are "not readily accessible to and not 22    capable of dispensing dyed diesel fuel into the fuel 23    supply tank of a motor vehicle" only if the dyed diesel 24    fuel is delivered from: (i) a dispenser hose that is short 25    enough so that it will not reach the fuel supply tank of a 26    motor vehicle or (ii) a dispenser that is enclosed by a   HB1390- 15 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    fence or other physical barrier so that a vehicle cannot 2    pull alongside the dispenser to permit fueling. 3        8. (Blank).4    All special fuel sold or used for non-highway purposes 5must have a dye added in accordance with Section 4d of this 6Law.7    All suits or other proceedings brought for the purpose of 8recovering any taxes, interest or penalties due the State of 9Illinois under this Act may be maintained in the name of the 10Department.11(Source: P.A. 102-1019, eff. 5-27-22.) 12    (35 ILCS 505/7)  (from Ch. 120, par. 423)13    Sec. 7. Any person who is , not licensed as a receiver or , 14distributor and who purchases or supplier, purchasing fuel or 15motor fuel as to which there has been no charge made to him of 16the tax imposed by Section 2 or 2a, or both, shall make payment 17of the tax imposed by Section 2a of this Act and if the same be 18thereafter used in the operation of a motor vehicle upon the 19public highways, make payment of the motor fuel tax computed 20at the rate prescribed in Section 2 of this Act on the amount 21so used, such payment to be made to the Department not later 22than the 20th day of the month succeeding the month in which 23the motor fuel was so used.24    This Section does not apply in cases of such use of motor 25fuel which was obtained tax-free under an official certificate   HB1390- 16 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1of exemption mentioned in Sections 6 and 6a of this Act.2(Source: P.A. 86-125.) 3    (35 ILCS 505/11.5)  (from Ch. 120, par. 427a)4    Sec. 11.5. In the event that liability upon the bond filed 5by a distributor, supplier, or receiver with the Department 6shall be discharged or reduced, whether by judgment rendered, 7payment made or otherwise, or if in the opinion of the 8Department the bond of any distributor, supplier, or receiver 9theretofore given shall become unsatisfactory, then the 10distributor, supplier, or receiver shall forthwith, upon the 11written demand of the Department, file a new bond in the same 12manner and form and in an amount and with sureties 13satisfactory to the Department, failing which the Department 14shall forthwith revoke the license of the distributor, 15supplier, or receiver.16    If such new bond shall be furnished by the distributor, 17supplier, or receiver as above provided, the Department shall 18cancel the bond for which such new bond shall be substituted.19    Any surety on any bond furnished by any distributor, 20supplier, or receiver shall be released and discharged from 21any and all liability to the State of Illinois accruing on such 22bond after the expiration of 60 days from the date upon which 23such surety shall have filed with the Department written 24request so to be released and discharged. But such request 25shall not operate to relieve, release or discharge such surety   HB1390- 17 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1from any liability already accrued, or which shall accrue, 2before the expiration of said 60-day period. The Department 3shall, promptly on receipt of such request, notify the 4distributor, supplier, or receiver and, unless such 5distributor, supplier, or receiver shall on or before the 6expiration of such 60-day period file with the Department a 7new bond with a surety or sureties satisfactory to the 8Department in the amount and form hereinbefore provided, the 9Department shall forthwith cancel the license of such 10distributor, supplier, or receiver. If such new bond shall be 11furnished by said distributor, supplier, or receiver as above 12provided, the Department shall cancel the bond for which such 13new bond shall be substituted.14(Source: P.A. 91-173, eff. 1-1-00.) 15    (35 ILCS 505/12)  (from Ch. 120, par. 428)16    Sec. 12. It is the duty of every distributor and , 17receiver, and supplier under this Act to keep within this 18State or at some office outside this State for any period for 19which the Department is authorized to issue a Notice of Tax 20Liability to the distributor or , receiver, or supplier 21records and books showing all purchases, receipts, losses 22through any cause, sales, distribution and use of motor fuel, 23aviation fuels, home heating oils, and kerosene, and products 24used for the purpose of blending to produce motor fuel, which 25records and books shall, at all times during business hours of   HB1390- 18 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1the day, be subject to inspection by the Department, or its 2duly authorized agents and employees. For purposes of this 3Section, "records" means all data maintained by the taxpayer 4including data on paper, microfilm, microfiche or any type of 5machine-sensible data compilation. The Department may, in its 6discretion, prescribe reasonable and uniform methods for 7keeping of records and books by licensees and that set forth 8requirements for the form and format of records that must be 9maintained in order to comply with any recordkeeping 10requirement under this Act.11(Source: P.A. 91-173, eff. 1-1-00.) 12    (35 ILCS 505/12a)  (from Ch. 120, par. 428a)13    Sec. 12a. (a) Any duly authorized agent or employee of the 14Department shall have authority to enter in or upon the 15premises of any manufacturer, vendor, dealer, retailer, 16distributor, receiver, supplier or user of motor fuel or 17special fuels during the regular business hours in order to 18examine books, records, invoices, storage tanks, and any other 19applicable equipment pertaining to motor fuel, aviation fuels, 20home heating oils, kerosene, or special fuels, to determine 21whether or not the taxes imposed by this Act have been paid.22    (b) Any duly authorized agent of the Department, upon 23presenting appropriate credentials and a written notice to the 24person who owns, operates, or controls the place to be 25inspected, shall have the authority to enter any place and to   HB1390- 19 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1conduct inspections in accordance with subsections (b) through 2(g) of this Section.3    (c) Inspections will be performed in a reasonable manner 4and at times that are reasonable under the circumstances, 5taking into consideration the normal business hours of the 6place to be entered.7    (d) Inspections may be at any place at which taxable motor 8fuel is or may be produced or stored or at any inspection site 9where evidence of the following activities may be discovered: 10        (1) Where any dyed diesel fuel is sold or held for sale 11    by any person for any use which the person knows or has 12    reason to know is not a nontaxable use of such fuel. 13        (2) Where any dyed diesel fuel is held for use or used 14    by any person for a use other than a nontaxable use and the 15    person knew, or had reason to know, that the fuel was dyed 16    according to Section 4d. 17        (3) Where any person willfully alters, or attempts to 18    alter, the strength or composition of any dye or marking 19    done pursuant to Section 4d of this Law.20    The places may include, but are not limited to, the 21following: 22        (1) Any terminal. 23        (2) Any fuel storage facility that is not a terminal. 24        (3) Any retail fuel facility. 25        (4) Any designated inspection site.26    (e) Duly authorized agents of the Department may   HB1390- 20 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1physically inspect, examine, or otherwise search any tank, 2reservoir, or other container that can or may be used for the 3production, storage, or transportation of fuel, fuel dyes, or 4fuel markers. Inspection may also be made of any equipment 5used for, or in connection with, production, storage, or 6transportation of fuel, fuel dyes, or fuel markers. This 7includes any equipment used for the dyeing or marking of fuel. 8This also includes books and records, if any, that are 9maintained at the place of inspection and are kept to 10determine tax liability under this Law.11    (f) Duly authorized agents of the Department may detain 12any motor vehicle, train, barge, ship, or vessel for the 13purpose of inspecting its fuel tanks and storage tanks. 14Detainment will be either on the premises under inspection or 15at a designated inspection site. Detainment may continue for a 16reasonable period of time as is necessary to determine the 17amount and composition of the fuel.18    (g) Duly authorized agents of the Department may take and 19remove samples of fuel in quantities as are reasonably 20necessary to determine the composition of the fuel. 21    (h) (1) Any person that refuses to allow an inspection 22    shall pay a $1,000 penalty for each refusal. This penalty 23    is in addition to any other penalty or tax that may be 24    imposed upon that person or any other person liable for 25    tax under this Law. All penalties received under this 26    subsection shall be deposited into the Tax Compliance and   HB1390- 21 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    Administration Fund. 2        (2) In addition, any licensee who refuses to allow an 3    inspection shall be subject to license revocation as 4    provided by Section 16 of this Law.5(Source: P.A. 91-173, eff. 1-1-00.) 6    (35 ILCS 505/13)  (from Ch. 120, par. 429)7    Sec. 13. Refund of tax paid. Any person other than a 8distributor or supplier, who loses motor fuel through any 9cause or uses motor fuel (upon which he has paid the amount 10required to be collected under Section 2 of this Act) for any 11purpose other than operating a motor vehicle upon the public 12highways or waters, shall be reimbursed and repaid the amount 13so paid.14    Any person who purchases motor fuel in Illinois and uses 15that motor fuel in another state and that other state imposes a 16tax on the use of such motor fuel shall be reimbursed and 17repaid the amount of Illinois tax paid under Section 2 of this 18Act on the motor fuel used in such other state. Reimbursement 19and repayment shall be made by the Department upon receipt of 20adequate proof of taxes directly paid to another state and the 21amount of motor fuel used in that state.22    Claims based in whole or in part on taxes paid to another 23state shall include (i) a certified copy of the tax return 24filed with such other state by the claimant; (ii) a copy of 25either the cancelled check paying the tax due on such return,   HB1390- 22 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1or a receipt acknowledging payment of the tax due on such tax 2return; and (iii) such other information as the Department may 3reasonably require. This paragraph shall not apply to taxes 4paid on returns filed under Section 13a.3 of this Act.5    Any person who purchases motor fuel use tax decals as 6required by Section 13a.4 and pays an amount of fees for such 7decals that exceeds the amount due shall be reimbursed and 8repaid the amount of the decal fees that are deemed by the 9department to be in excess of the amount due. Alternatively, 10any person who purchases motor fuel use tax decals as required 11by Section 13a.4 may credit any excess decal payment verified 12by the Department against amounts subsequently due for the 13purchase of additional decals, until such time as no excess 14payment remains. 15    Claims for such reimbursement must be made to the 16Department of Revenue, duly verified by the claimant (or by 17the claimant's legal representative if the claimant has died 18or become a person under legal disability), upon forms 19prescribed by the Department. The claim must state such facts 20relating to the purchase, importation, manufacture or 21production of the motor fuel by the claimant as the Department 22may deem necessary, and the time when, and the circumstances 23of its loss or the specific purpose for which it was used (as 24the case may be), together with such other information as the 25Department may reasonably require. No claim based upon idle 26time shall be allowed. Claims for reimbursement for   HB1390- 23 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1overpayment of decal fees shall be made to the Department of 2Revenue, duly verified by the claimant (or by the claimant's 3legal representative if the claimant has died or become a 4person under legal disability), upon forms prescribed by the 5Department. The claim shall state facts relating to the 6overpayment of decal fees, together with such other 7information as the Department may reasonably require. Claims 8for reimbursement of overpayment of decal fees paid on or 9after January 1, 2011 must be filed not later than one year 10after the date on which the fees were paid by the claimant. If 11it is determined that the Department should reimburse a 12claimant for overpayment of decal fees, the Department shall 13first apply the amount of such refund against any tax or 14penalty or interest due by the claimant under Section 13a of 15this Act. 16    Claims for full reimbursement for taxes paid on or before 17December 31, 1999 must be filed not later than one year after 18the date on which the tax was paid by the claimant. If, 19however, a claim for such reimbursement otherwise meeting the 20requirements of this Section is filed more than one year but 21less than 2 years after that date, the claimant shall be 22reimbursed at the rate of 80% of the amount to which he would 23have been entitled if his claim had been timely filed.24    Claims for full reimbursement for taxes paid on or after 25January 1, 2000 must be filed not later than 2 years after the 26date on which the tax was paid by the claimant.  HB1390- 24 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    The Department may make such investigation of the 2correctness of the facts stated in such claims as it deems 3necessary. When the Department has approved any such claim, it 4shall pay to the claimant (or to the claimant's legal 5representative, as such if the claimant has died or become a 6person under legal disability) the reimbursement provided in 7this Section, out of any moneys appropriated to it for that 8purpose.9    Any distributor or supplier who has paid the tax imposed 10by Section 2 of this Act upon motor fuel lost or used by such 11distributor or supplier for any purpose other than operating a 12motor vehicle upon the public highways or waters may file a 13claim for credit or refund to recover the amount so paid. Such 14claims shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Department. 15Such claims shall be made to the Department, duly verified by 16the claimant (or by the claimant's legal representative if the 17claimant has died or become a person under legal disability), 18upon forms prescribed by the Department. The claim shall state 19such facts relating to the purchase, importation, manufacture 20or production of the motor fuel by the claimant as the 21Department may deem necessary and the time when the loss or 22nontaxable use occurred, and the circumstances of its loss or 23the specific purpose for which it was used (as the case may 24be), together with such other information as the Department 25may reasonably require. Claims must be filed not later than 26one year after the date on which the tax was paid by the   HB1390- 25 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1claimant.2    The Department may make such investigation of the 3correctness of the facts stated in such claims as it deems 4necessary. When the Department approves a claim, the 5Department shall issue a refund or credit memorandum as 6requested by the taxpayer, to the distributor or supplier who 7made the payment for which the refund or credit is being given 8or, if the distributor or supplier has died or become 9incompetent, to such distributor's or supplier's legal 10representative, as such. The amount of such credit memorandum 11shall be credited against any tax due or to become due under 12this Act from the distributor or supplier who made the payment 13for which credit has been given.14    Any credit or refund that is allowed under this Section 15shall bear interest at the rate and in the manner specified in 16the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act.17    In case the distributor or supplier requests and the 18Department determines that the claimant is entitled to a 19refund, such refund shall be made only from such appropriation 20as may be available for that purpose. If it appears unlikely 21that the amount appropriated would permit everyone having a 22claim allowed during the period covered by such appropriation 23to elect to receive a cash refund, the Department, by rule or 24regulation, shall provide for the payment of refunds in 25hardship cases and shall define what types of cases qualify as 26hardship cases.  HB1390- 26 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    In any case in which there has been an erroneous refund of 2tax or fees payable under this Section, a notice of tax 3liability may be issued at any time within 3 years from the 4making of that refund, or within 5 years from the making of 5that refund if it appears that any part of the refund was 6induced by fraud or the misrepresentation of material fact. 7The amount of any proposed assessment set forth by the 8Department shall be limited to the amount of the erroneous 9refund.10    If no tax is due and no proceeding is pending to determine 11whether such distributor or supplier is indebted to the 12Department for tax, the credit memorandum so issued may be 13assigned and set over by the lawful holder thereof, subject to 14reasonable rules of the Department, to any other licensed 15distributor or supplier who is subject to this Act, and the 16amount thereof applied by the Department against any tax due 17or to become due under this Act from such assignee.18    If the payment for which the distributor's or supplier's 19claim is filed is held in the protest fund of the State 20Treasury during the pendency of the claim for credit 21proceedings pursuant to the order of the court in accordance 22with Section 2a of the State Officers and Employees Money 23Disposition Act and if it is determined by the Department or by 24the final order of a reviewing court under the Administrative 25Review Law that the claimant is entitled to all or a part of 26the credit claimed, the claimant, instead of receiving a   HB1390- 27 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1credit memorandum from the Department, shall receive a cash 2refund from the protest fund as provided for in Section 2a of 3the State Officers and Employees Money Disposition Act.4    If any person ceases to be licensed as a distributor or 5supplier while still holding an unused credit memorandum 6issued under this Act, such person may, at his election 7(instead of assigning the credit memorandum to a licensed 8distributor or licensed supplier under this Act), surrender 9such unused credit memorandum to the Department and receive a 10refund of the amount to which such person is entitled.11    For claims based upon taxes paid on or before December 31, 122000, a claim based upon the use of undyed diesel fuel shall 13not be allowed except (i) if allowed under the following 14paragraph or (ii) for undyed diesel fuel used by a commercial 15vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 1-111.8 of the 16Illinois Vehicle Code, for any purpose other than operating 17the commercial vehicle upon the public highways and unlicensed 18commercial vehicles operating on private property. Claims 19shall be limited to commercial vehicles that are operated for 20both highway purposes and any purposes other than operating 21such vehicles upon the public highways.22    For claims based upon taxes paid on or after January 1, 232000, a claim based upon the use of undyed diesel fuel shall 24not be allowed except (i) if allowed under the preceding 25paragraph or (ii) for claims for the following: 26        (1) Undyed diesel fuel used (i) in a manufacturing   HB1390- 28 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    process, as defined in Section 2-45 of the Retailers' 2    Occupation Tax Act, wherein the undyed diesel fuel becomes 3    a component part of a product or by-product, other than 4    fuel or motor fuel, when the use of dyed diesel fuel in 5    that manufacturing process results in a product that is 6    unsuitable for its intended use or (ii) for testing 7    machinery and equipment in a manufacturing process, as 8    defined in Section 2-45 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 9    Act, wherein the testing takes place on private property. 10        (2) Undyed diesel fuel used by a manufacturer on 11    private property in the research and development, as 12    defined in Section 1.29, of machinery or equipment 13    intended for manufacture. 14        (3) Undyed diesel fuel used by a single unit 15    self-propelled agricultural fertilizer implement, 16    designed for on and off road use, equipped with flotation 17    tires and specially adapted for the application of plant 18    food materials or agricultural chemicals. 19        (4) Undyed diesel fuel used by a commercial motor 20    vehicle for any purpose other than operating the 21    commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways. Claims 22    shall be limited to commercial motor vehicles that are 23    operated for both highway purposes and any purposes other 24    than operating such vehicles upon the public highways. 25        (5) Undyed diesel fuel used by a unit of local 26    government in its operation of an airport if the undyed   HB1390- 29 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    diesel fuel is used directly in airport operations on 2    airport property. 3        (6) Undyed diesel fuel used by refrigeration units 4    that are permanently mounted to a semitrailer, as defined 5    in Section 1.28 of this Law, wherein the refrigeration 6    units have a fuel supply system dedicated solely for the 7    operation of the refrigeration units. 8        (7) Undyed diesel fuel used by power take-off 9    equipment as defined in Section 1.27 of this Law.10        (8) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 11    Act of the 94th General Assembly, undyed diesel fuel used 12    by tugs and spotter equipment to shift vehicles or parcels 13    on both private and airport property. Any claim under this 14    item (8) may be made only by a claimant that owns tugs and 15    spotter equipment and operates that equipment on both 16    private and airport property. The aggregate of all credits 17    or refunds resulting from claims filed under this item (8) 18    by a claimant in any calendar year may not exceed 19    $100,000. A claim may not be made under this item (8) by 20    the same claimant more often than once each quarter. For 21    the purposes of this item (8), "tug" means a vehicle 22    designed for use on airport property that shifts 23    custom-designed containers of parcels from loading docks 24    to aircraft, and "spotter equipment" means a vehicle 25    designed for use on both private and airport property that 26    shifts trailers containing parcels between staging areas   HB1390- 30 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    and loading docks. 2    Any person who has paid the tax imposed by Section 2 of 3this Law upon undyed diesel fuel that is unintentionally mixed 4with dyed diesel fuel and who owns or controls the mixture of 5undyed diesel fuel and dyed diesel fuel may file a claim for 6refund to recover the amount paid. The amount of undyed diesel 7fuel unintentionally mixed must equal 500 gallons or more. Any 8claim for refund of unintentionally mixed undyed diesel fuel 9and dyed diesel fuel shall be supported by documentation 10showing the date and location of the unintentional mixing, the 11number of gallons involved, the disposition of the mixed 12diesel fuel, and any other information that the Department may 13reasonably require. Any unintentional mixture of undyed diesel 14fuel and dyed diesel fuel shall be sold or used only for 15non-highway purposes.16    The Department shall promulgate regulations establishing 17specific limits on the amount of undyed diesel fuel that may be 18claimed for refund.19    For purposes of claims for refund, "loss" means the 20reduction of motor fuel resulting from fire, theft, spillage, 21spoilage, leakage, or any other provable cause, but does not 22include a reduction resulting from evaporation, or shrinkage 23due to temperature variations. In the case of losses due to 24fire or theft, the claimant must include fire department or 25police department reports and any other documentation that the 26Department may require.   HB1390- 31 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1(Source: P.A. 100-1171, eff. 1-4-19.) 2    (35 ILCS 505/14a)  (from Ch. 120, par. 430.1)3    Sec. 14a. The Department of Revenue may enter into 4reciprocal agreements with the appropriate officials of any 5other state under which the Department may waive all or any 6part of the requirements imposed by the laws of this State upon 7those who use or consume motor fuel in Illinois upon which a 8tax has been paid to such other state, provided that the 9officials of such other state grant equivalent privileges with 10respect to motor fuel used in such other state but upon which 11the tax has been paid to Illinois.12    The Department may enter the International Fuel Tax 13Agreement or other cooperative compacts or agreements with 14other states or jurisdictions to permit base state or base 15jurisdiction licensing of persons using motor fuel in this 16State. Those agreements may provide for the cooperation and 17assistance among member states in the administration and 18collection of motor fuel tax, including, but not limited to, 19exchanges of information, auditing and assessing of interstate 20carriers and suppliers, and any other activities necessary to 21further uniformity.22    Pursuant to federal mandate, upon membership in the 23International Fuel Tax Agreement ("Agreement"), the motor fuel 24use tax imposed upon Commercial Motor Vehicles required to be 25registered under the terms of the Agreement shall be   HB1390- 32 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1administered according to the terms of the Agreement, as now 2and hereafter amended. Illinois shall not establish, maintain, 3or enforce any law or regulation that has fuel use tax 4reporting requirements or that provides for the payment of a 5fuel use tax, unless that law or regulation is in conformity 6with the Agreement.7    The Department shall adopt rules and regulations to 8implement the provisions of the Agreement.9(Source: P.A. 88-480.) 10    (35 ILCS 505/15)  (from Ch. 120, par. 431)11    Sec. 15. 1. Any person who knowingly acts as a distributor 12of motor fuel or supplier of special fuel, or receiver of fuel 13without having a license so to do, or who knowingly fails or 14refuses to file a return with the Department as provided in 15Section 2b, Section 5, or Section 5a of this Act, or who 16knowingly fails or refuses to make payment to the Department 17as provided either in Section 2b, Section 6, Section 6a, or 18Section 7 of this Act, shall be guilty of a Class 3 felony. 19Each day any person knowingly acts as a distributor of motor 20fuel, supplier of special fuel, or receiver of fuel without 21having a license so to do or after such a license has been 22revoked, constitutes a separate offense.23    2. Any person who acts as a motor carrier without having a 24valid motor fuel use tax license, issued by the Department or 25by a member jurisdiction under the provisions of the   HB1390- 33 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1International Fuel Tax Agreement, or a valid single trip 2permit is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first offense 3and is guilty of a Class 4 felony for each subsequent offense. 4Any person (i) who fails or refuses to make payment to the 5Department as provided in Section 13a.1 of this Act or in the 6International Fuel Tax Agreement referenced in Section 14a, or 7(ii) who fails or refuses to make the quarterly return as 8provided in Section 13a.3 is guilty of a Class 4 felony; and 9for each subsequent offense, such person is guilty of a Class 3 10felony.11    3. In case such person acting as a distributor, receiver, 12supplier, or motor carrier is a corporation, then the officer 13or officers, agent or agents, employee or employees, of such 14corporation responsible for any act of such corporation, or 15failure of such corporation to act, which acts or failure to 16act constitutes a violation of any of the provisions of this 17Act as enumerated in paragraphs 1 and 2 of this Section, shall 18be punished by such fine or imprisonment, or by both such fine 19and imprisonment as provided in those paragraphs.20    3.5. Any person who knowingly enters false information on 21any supporting documentation required to be kept by Section 6 22or 6a of this Act is guilty of a Class 3 felony.23    3.7. Any person who knowingly attempts in any manner to 24evade or defeat any tax imposed by this Act or the payment of 25any tax imposed by this Act is guilty of a Class 2 felony.26    4. Any person who refuses, upon demand, to submit for   HB1390- 34 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1inspection, books and records, or who fails or refuses to keep 2books and records in violation of Section 12 of this Act, or 3any distributor or , receiver, or supplier who violates any 4reasonable rule or regulation adopted by the Department for 5the enforcement of this Act is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 6Any person who acts as a blender in violation of Section 3 of 7this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony.8    5. Any person licensed under Section 13a.4, 13a.5, or the 9International Fuel Tax Agreement who: (a) fails or refuses to 10keep records and books, as provided in Section 13a.2 or as 11required by the terms of the International Fuel Tax Agreement, 12(b) refuses upon demand by the Department to submit for 13inspection and examination the records required by Section 1413a.2 of this Act or by the terms of the International Fuel Tax 15Agreement, or (c) violates any reasonable rule or regulation 16adopted by the Department for the enforcement of this Act, is 17guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.18    6. Any person who makes any false return or report to the 19Department as to any material fact required by Sections 2b, 5, 205a, 7, 13, or 13a.3 of this Act or by the International Fuel 21Tax Agreement is guilty of a Class 2 felony.22    7. A prosecution for any violation of this Section may be 23commenced anytime within 5 years of the commission of that 24violation. A prosecution for tax evasion as set forth in 25paragraph 3.7 of this Section may be prosecuted any time 26within 5 years of the commission of the last act in furtherance   HB1390- 35 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1of evasion. The running of the period of limitations under 2this Section shall be suspended while any proceeding or appeal 3from any proceeding relating to the quashing or enforcement of 4any grand jury or administrative subpoena issued in connection 5with an investigation of the violation of any provision of 6this Act is pending.7    8. Any person who provides false documentation required by 8any Section of this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony.9    9. Any person filing a fraudulent application or order 10form under any provision of this Act is guilty of a Class A 11misdemeanor. For each subsequent offense, the person is guilty 12of a Class 4 felony.13    10. Any person who acts as a motor carrier and who fails to 14carry a manifest as provided in Section 5.5 is guilty of a 15Class A misdemeanor. For each subsequent offense, the person 16is guilty of a Class 4 felony.17    11. Any person who knowingly sells or attempts to sell 18dyed diesel fuel for highway use or for use by 19recreational-type watercraft on the waters of this State is 20guilty of a Class 4 felony. For each subsequent offense, the 21person is guilty of a Class 2 felony.22    12. Any person who knowingly possesses dyed diesel fuel 23for highway use or for use by recreational-type watercraft on 24the waters of this State is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 25For each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a Class 4 26felony.  HB1390- 36 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    13. Any person who sells or transports dyed diesel fuel 2without the notice required by Section 4e shall pay the 3following penalty:4    First occurrence....................................$ 5005    Second and each occurrence thereafter..............$1,0006    14. Any person who owns, operates, or controls any 7container, storage tank, or facility used to store or 8distribute dyed diesel fuel without the notice required by 9Section 4f shall pay the following penalty:10    First occurrence....................................$ 50011    Second and each occurrence thereafter..............$1,00012    15. If a motor vehicle required to be registered for 13highway purposes is found to have dyed diesel fuel within the 14ordinary fuel tanks attached to the motor vehicle or if a 15recreational-type watercraft on the waters of this State is 16found to have dyed diesel fuel within the ordinary fuel tanks 17attached to the watercraft, the operator shall pay the 18following penalty:19    First occurrence...................................$1,00020    Second and each occurrence thereafter..............$5,00021    16. Any licensed motor fuel distributor or licensed 22supplier who sells or attempts to sell dyed diesel fuel for 23highway use or for use by recreational-type watercraft on the 24waters of this State shall pay the following penalty:25    First occurrence...................................$1,00026    Second and each occurrence thereafter..............$5,000  HB1390- 37 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1    17. Any person who knowingly sells or distributes dyed 2diesel fuel without the notice required by Section 4e is 3guilty of a petty offense. For each subsequent offense, the 4person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.5    18. Any person who knowingly owns, operates, or controls 6any container, storage tank, or facility used to store or 7distribute dyed diesel fuel without the notice required by 8Section 4f is guilty of a petty offense. For each subsequent 9offense the person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.10    For purposes of this Section, dyed diesel fuel means any 11dyed diesel fuel whether or not dyed pursuant to Section 4d of 12this Law.13    Any person aggrieved by any action of the Department under 14item 13, 14, 15, or 16 of this Section may protest the action 15by making a written request for a hearing within 60 days of the 16original action. If the hearing is not requested in writing 17within 60 days, the original action is final.18    All penalties received under items 13, 14, 15, and 16 of 19this Section shall be deposited into the Tax Compliance and 20Administration Fund.21(Source: P.A. 102-851, eff. 1-1-23.) 22    (35 ILCS 505/16)  (from Ch. 120, par. 432)23    Sec. 16. The Department may, after 5 days' notice, revoke 24the distributor's or , receiver's, or supplier's license or 25permit of any person (1) who does not operate as a distributor   HB1390- 38 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1or , receiver, supplier (a) under Sections 1.2, 1.14, or 1.20, 2(2) who violates any provision of this Act or any rule or 3regulation promulgated by the Department under Section 14 of 4this Act, or (3) who refuses to allow any inspection or test 5authorized by this Law.6    Any person whose returns for 2 or more consecutive months 7do not show sufficient taxable sales to indicate an active 8business as a distributor or , receiver, or supplier shall be 9deemed to not be operating as a distributor or , receiver, or 10supplier as defined in Sections 1.2, 1.14 or 1.20.11    The Department may, after 5 days notice, revoke any 12distributor'sor , receiver's, or supplier's license of a 13person who is registered as a reseller of motor fuel pursuant 14to Section 2a or 2c of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and 15who fails to collect such prepaid tax on invoiced gallons of 16motor fuel sold or who fails to deliver a statement of tax paid 17to the purchaser or to the Department as required by Sections 182d and 2e of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.19    The Department may, on notice given by registered mail, 20cancel a Blender's Permit for any violation of any provisions 21of this Act or for noncompliance with any rule or regulation 22made by the Department under Section 14 of this Act.23    The Department, upon complaint filed in the circuit court, 24may, by injunction, restrain any person who fails or refuses 25to comply with the provisions of this Act from acting as a 26blender or distributor of motor fuel, supplier of special   HB1390- 39 -LRB104 07494 HLH 17537 b1fuel, or as a receiver of fuel in this State.2    The Department may revoke the motor fuel use tax license 3of a motor carrier registered under Section 13a.4, or that is 4required to be registered under the terms of the International 5Fuel Tax Agreement, that violates any provision of this Act or 6any rule promulgated by the Department under Sections 14 or 714a of this Act. Motor fuel use tax licenses that have been 8revoked are subject to a $100 reinstatement fee.9    Licensees registered or required to be registered under 10Section 13a.4, or persons required to obtain single trip 11permits under Section 13a.5, may protest any action or audit 12finding made by the Department by making a written request for 13a hearing within 30 days after service of the notice of the 14original action or finding. If the hearing is not requested 15within 30 days in writing, the original finding or action is 16final. Once a hearing has been properly requested, the 17Department shall give at least 20 days written notice of the 18time and place of the hearing.19(Source: P.A. 94-1074, eff. 12-26-06.) 20    (35 ILCS 505/1.14 rep.)21    (35 ILCS 505/3a rep.)22    (35 ILCS 505/5a rep.)23    (35 ILCS 505/6a rep.)24    Section 10. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by repealing 25Sections 1.14, 3a, 5a, and 6a.